Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-104
Prospectors; specimens preserved.

It shall be the duty of the persons prospecting for coal, any mineral, ore, crude oil, or gas, carefully to preserve specimens from each stratum through which the shafts are sunk, or borings are made; and to deposit the same, properly labeled, in care of the proper department of the state for the future use of the commonwealth.

Laws 1903, c. 63, § 4, p. 361;

R.S.1913, § 4011;

C.S.1922, § 3414;

C.S.1929, § 57-104;

R.S.1943, § 57-104;

Laws 1978, LB 661, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 709, § 1.